North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 5. Loan Fund for Prospective College Teachers.

§ 116-71.
Purpose of Article.

The purpose of this Article is to encourage, assist, and expedite the postgraduate-level education and training of competent teachers for the public and private universities, colleges and community colleges in this State by the granting of loans to finance such study. The funds shall be used to increase the number of teaching faculty as distinguished from research specialists.

History.

1965, c. 1148, s. 1; 1987, c. 564, s. 22.

§ 116-72.
Fund established.

There is established a loan fund for prospective college teachers to assist capable persons to pursue study and training leading to masters or doctorate degrees in preparation to become teachers in the public and private institutions of education beyond the high school in North Carolina. Both private and public sources may be solicited in the creation of the fund.

History.

1965, c. 1148, s. 1.

§ 116-73.
Joint committee for administration of fund; rules and regulations.

“The Scholarship Loan Fund for Prospective College Teachers” shall be the responsibility of the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina and the State Board of Education and will be administered by them through a joint committee, “The College Scholarship Loan Committee.” This Committee will operate under the following rules and regulations and under such further rules and regulations as the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina and the State Board of Education shall jointly promulgate.

The nomination of applicants and recommendations of renewals shall be the responsibility of the College Scholarship Loan Committee.

Loans should be made for a single academic year (nine months) with renewal possible for two successive years for students successfully pursuing masters or doctoral programs. Loans shall not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for single students and three thousand dollars ($3,000) for married students.

All scholarship loans shall be evidenced by notes, with sufficient sureties, made payable to the State Board of Education, and shall bear interest at the rate of four percent (4%) per annum from and after September 1 following the awarding of the candidate’s degree.

Recipients of loans may have them repaid by teaching in a college or other educational institution beyond the high school level in North Carolina upon completion of their masters or doctorate degree program, at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100.00) per month for each month of such teaching. If a student supported by a loan in this program should fail to so teach in a North Carolina institution, the loan would become repayable to the State, with interest, for that part of the teaching commitment not met, said note to be repaid according to the terms thereof.

Loans for 12 weeks of summer study, carrying stipends not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) for single and married students, should be available to students who do not plan to attend postgraduate school as full-time students during the regular academic year. Recipients should be eligible for up to three renewals over a four-year period. The obligation to teach in a North Carolina college or other educational institution, or failing that, to repay the State, shall apply proportionally as indicated above.

History.

1965, c. 1148, s. 1; 1971, c. 1244, s. 14.

§ 116-74.
Duration of fund; use of repaid loans and interest.

The Scholarship Loan Fund for Prospective College Teachers shall continue in effect until terminated by action of the General Assembly of North Carolina. Such amounts of loans as shall be repaid from time to time under the provisions of this Article, together with such amounts of interest as may be received on account of loans made shall become a part of the principal amount of said loan fund. These funds shall be administered for the same purposes and under the same provisions as are set forth herein to the end that they may be utilized in addition to such further amounts as may be privately donated or appropriated from time to time by public or corporate bodies.

History.

1965, c. 1148, s. 1.

§§ 116-74.1 through 116-74.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.